District of Columbia statutes.
50-1634

Enforcement.

(a)

The Mayor shall promulgate a schedule of civil fines not to exceed $50 for violations of the provisions of this subchapter and rules promulgated pursuant to § 50-1632(d)(3).

(b)

The proposed schedule of fines shall be submitted to the Council of the District of Columbia within 60 days of March 29, 1988 for approval, in whole or in part, by resolution. Nothing in this subchapter shall affect any requirements imposed upon the Mayor by subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

Mar. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-97, § 5, 35 DCR 1045
1981 Ed., § 40-1414.
Approval of proposed schedule of fines: Pursuant to Resolution 8-150, the “Commercial Bicycle Operators Licensing Act Schedule of Fines Approval Resolution of 1989”, effective November 21, 1989, the Council approved the proposed schedule of fines for violations of the provisions of the Commercial Bicycle Operators Licensing Act of 1987.